District of Columbia statutes.
8-732

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Nov. 19, 2008, D.C. Law 17-259, § 3, 55 DCR 10881

Cross References

Illegal dumping, enforcement, see § 8-903.
Illegal dumping, forfeitures, see § 8-905.
Illegal dumping, prohibition and penalties, see § 8-902.
Licensure, clean hands requirement, prohibition against issuance of licenses, see § 47-2862.
Solid waste management and multi-material recycling, fines and penalties, see § 8-1017.